en: Fuji apples
es: Manzanas Fuji
fr: Pommes Fuji
hr: Fuji jabuke
it: Mele Fuji
la: Malus domestica cult. Red Delicious x Ralls Genet
lt: Fuji obuoliai
nl: Fuji appels

en: Gala apples, Apples (Gala)
de: Gala Äpfel
es: Manzanas Gala, Manzanas Royal Gala
fi: Gala-omenat
fr: Pommes gala, Gala
hr: Gala jabuke
it: Mele gala
la: Malus domestica cult. Kidd's Orange Red' x Golden Delicious
lt: Gala obuoliai
nl: Gala appels
ro: Mere Gala

en: Golden Delicious apples, Golden delicious, Golden Apples, Golden, Apples (Golden Delicious)
de: Golden Delicious Äpfel, Golden Delicious, Golden Äpfel, Golden
es: Manzanas Golden Delicious
fi: Golden Delicious -omenat
fr: Pommes Golden Delicious, Pommes Golden
hr: Jabuke golden delicious
la: Malus domestica cult. Golden Delicious
lt: Golden obuoliai
nl: Golden Delicious appels

en: Golden apple pulp and skin
fr: Pulpe et peau de pomme Golden

en: Granny Smith apples, Granny Smith, Apples (Granny Smith)
de: Granny Smith Äpfel, Granny Smith
es: Manzanas Granny Smith
fr: Pommes Granny Smith
hr: Granny smith jabuke
la: Malus domestica x Malus sylvestris
lt: Granny Smith obuoliai
nl: Granny Smith appels

en: Idared apples
sv: Idared äpplen

en: Red Delicious apples, Red Delicious
de: Delikate rote Äpfel
es: Manzanas Red Delicious
fr: Pommes Red Delicious
hr: Crvene ukusne jabuke
la: Malus domestica cult. Red Delicious
nl: Red Delicious appels

en: Pink Lady, Cripps Pink, Apples (Pink Lady)
xx: Pink Lady, Cripps Pink

en: Russet apples
es: Manzanas reineta
fr: Pommes reinette
hr: Riđe jabuke
nl: Reinette appels

en: Pixie apples
xx: Pixie
fr: Pommes Pixie

en: Opal apples
xx: Opal
fr: Pommes Opal

en: Canada Reinettes apples, Canada Apples, Canada Reinettes, Canadian Reinettes, Canadian Reinettes Apples, Canada Russet apples, Apples (Canada Reinette)
fr: Pommes Reinettes du Canada, Pommes Canada Grises, Pommes du Canada, Reinettes du Canada

en: Canada apple pulp
fr: Pulpe de pomme Canada

en: Kanzi apples
nl: Kanzi-appels

en: Boiled apples without skin, Apples without skin cooked in water
fr: Pulpe de pomme bouillie, Pulpe de pomme cuite à l'eau

en: Roasted apple pulp, Baked apple pulp
fr: Pulpe de pomme rôtie, Pulpe de pomme cuite au four

en: Apple pulp and peel
fr: Pulpe et peau de pomme

en: Apple pulp
fr: Pulpe de pomme
hr: Pulpa jabuke
lt: Obuolių minkštimas

en: Apricots
de: Aprikosen, Aprikose
es: Albaricoques
fi: aprikoosit
fr: Abricots
hr: Kajsije
it: Albicocche
ja: アンズ, アプリコット
lt: Abrikosai
nl: Abrikozen
sv: Aprikoser, aprikos
tr: Kayısı

en: Fresh apricots
de: Frische Aprikosen
fr: Abricots frais
hr: Svježe marelice
lt: Švieži abrikosai